Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
226

HAWAII STATE PLANNING ACT

Part I. Overall Theme, Goals, Objectives
and Policies

Section

226-1 Findings and purpose

226-2 Definitions

226-3 Overall theme

226-4 State goals

226-5 Objective and policies for population

226-6 Objectives and policies for the
economy--in general

226-7 Objectives and policies for the
economy--agriculture

226-8 Objective and policies for the
economy--visitor

industry

226-9 Objective and policies for the
economy--federal

expenditures

226-10 Objective and policies for the
economy--potential

growth and innovative activities

226-10.5 Objectives and policies for the
economy--information

industry

226-11 Objectives and policies for the physical

environment--land-based, shoreline, and
marine

resources

226-12 Objective and policies for the physical
environment--

scenic, natural beauty, and historic
resources

226-13 Objectives and policies for the physical
environment--

land, air, and water quality

226-14 Objective and policies for facility
systems--in

general

226-15 Objectives and policies for facility
systems--solid

and liquid wastes

226-16 Objective and policies for facility
systems--water

226-17 Objectives and policies for facility
systems--

transportation

226-18 Objectives and policies for facility
systems--energy

226-18.5 Objectives and policies for facility
systems--

telecommunications

226-19 Objectives and policies for socio-cultural

advancement--housing

226-20 Objectives and policies for socio-cultural

advancement--health

226-21 Objective and policies for socio-cultural

advancement--education

226-22 Objective and policies for socio-cultural

advancement--social services

226-23 Objective and policies for socio-cultural

advancement--leisure

226-24 Objective and policies for socio-cultural

advancement--individual rights and
personal

well-being

226-25 Objective and policies for socio-cultural

advancement--culture

226-26 Objectives and policies for socio-cultural

advancement--public safety

226-27 Objectives and policies for socio-cultural

advancement--government

226-28 Repealed

Part II. Planning Coordination and
Implementation

226-51 Purpose

226-52 Statewide planning system

226-53 Office of planning; duties

226-54 Amendments to this chapter

226-55 Functional plans; preparation

226-56 Functional plans; form and submittal

226-57 Functional plans; implementation

226-58 County general plans

226-59 State programs

226-60 Repealed

226-61 Renumbered

226-62 Repealed

226-63 Hawaii interagency council for
transit-oriented

development

226-64 Hawaii interagency council for
transit-oriented

development; membership

Part III. Priority Guidelines

226-101 Purpose

226-102 Overall direction

226-103 Economic priority guidelines

226-104 Population growth and land resources
priority

guidelines

226-105 Crime and criminal justice

226-106 Affordable housing

226-107 Quality education

226-108 Sustainability

226-109 Climate change adaptation priority
guidelines

Note

2050 sustainability
plan; update every ten years. L Sp 2005, c 8; L 2006, c 210, §2.

Military presence in
Hawaii; memorandum of understanding. L 2012, c 65.

Cross References

Climate adaptation,
see chapter 225P.

Sustainable business
corporations, see chapter 420D.

Law Journals and Reviews

Kaiser Hawaii Kai
Development Company v. City and County of Honolulu: Zoning by Initiative in
Hawaii. 12 UH L. Rev. 181.

Maha‘ulepu v. Land
Use Commission: A Symbol of Change; Hawaii's Land Use Law Allows Golf Course
Development on Prime Agricultural Land by Special Use Permit. 13 UH L. Rev.
205.

Honolulu's Ohana
Zoning Law: To Ohana or Not to Ohana. 13 UH L. Rev. 505.

The Lum Court, Land
Use, and the Environment: A Survey of Hawai‘i Case Law 1983 to 1991. 14 UH L.
Rev. 119.

Dolan v. City of
Tigard: Individual Property Rights v. Land Management Systems. 17 UH L. Rev.
193.

Avoiding the Next
Hokuli‘a: The Debate over Hawai‘i's Agricultural Subdivisions. 27 UH L. Rev.
441 (2005).

Water Regulation,
Land Use and the Environment. 30 UH L. Rev. 49 (2007).

The (Somewhat) False
Hope of Comprehensive Planning. 37 UH L. Rev. 39 (2015).

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next